Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1539.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Electric School Bus Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Charging infrastructure." A facility or equipment that is used to charge a battery or other energy storage device of a vehicle that is fully or partially powered by electricity."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Electric school bus." A school bus that is powered 123456789101112131415161718 exclusively by an electric motor that draws its current from rechargeable storage batteries that are recharged with electricity from an electric vehicle charging station."Electric vehicle." A vehicle that is exclusively powered by and refueled by electricity and must be plugged in to charge."Eligible applicant." Any of the following:(1) A school entity.(2) A nonprofit or for-profit entity that provides contracted transportation services to a school entity."Eligible costs." Any of the following:(1) Costs related to:(i) the procurement and maintenance of electric school buses;(ii) the conversion of internal combustion engine buses to electric school buses;(iii) the procurement or installation of charging infrastructure and electrical upgrades as necessary to support charging infrastructure;(iv) training for personnel on electric school bus operation and maintenance; or(v) workforce development initiatives to support electric school bus deployment.(2) Administrative costs associated with the procurement, conversion or maintenance specified under paragraph (1), including up-front third-party administrative costs associated with developing and implementing a proposal for the procurement, conversion or maintenance.(3) Any other costs approved by the department."Fund." The Electric School Bus Grant Program Fund established under section 5(a).20250HB1539PN1810 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Grantee." A recipient of a grant under the program."Internal combustion engine school bus." A school bus powered by diesel, gasoline, compressed natural gas or propane."Nonattainment area." An area of this Commonwealth that has been designated by the Environmental Protection Agency as being in nonattainment with national ambient air quality standards."Program." The Electric School Bus Grant Program established under section 3(a)."School bus." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."School entity." A public school, including a school district, an intermediate unit, an area career and technical school or a chartered school for the education of the deaf or the blind, operating within this Commonwealth.Section 3. Electric School Bus Grant Program.(a) Establishment and purpose.--The Electric School Bus Grant Program is established within the department to award grants for eligible costs to eligible applicants on a competitive basis to the extent that money is appropriated for this purpose.(b) Duties.--The department shall:(1) Administer the program, including providing the necessary technical assistance for the program to eligible applicants. Technical assistance includes:(i) Guidance on grant application preparation and submission.(ii) Support for developing long-term cost-effective fleet transition plans.(iii) Assistance with identifying appropriate charging infrastructure solutions.20250HB1539PN1810 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Coordination with utility providers for infrastructure upgrades.(v) Training for staff on electric school bus operations and maintenance.(vi) Resources to help school entities identify and leverage additional funding opportunities.(2) Establish an application process through which the eligible applicants can apply for grants. The following apply:(i) The application process must be designed to be as streamlined and minimally burdensome as possible for applicants, while still ensuring that the department collects the necessary information to evaluate applications effectively.(ii) The department shall post information about the application process, including an application form that the department develops for the program, on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(3) Establish guidelines necessary to implement and administer this act.(c) Application.--(1) An eligible applicant shall submit an application on a form and in a manner as determined by the department.(2) The application shall require an eligible applicant that is a nonprofit or a for-profit entity that provides contracted transportation services to a school entity to specify with which school entity or entities the transportation entity will utilize the proposed grant and the length of the contract currently in effect or anticipated between the transportation entity and the school entity.20250HB1539PN1810 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Audits.--The department may randomly audit and monitor grantees to ensure the appropriate use of grant money and compliance with the provisions of this act and department guidelines established under subsection (b)(3).Section 4. Award of grants.(a) Criteria.--The department shall develop criteria for grantees under the program, which shall give priority to an eligible applicant that meets any of the following criteria:(1) Is located in a nonattainment area.(2) Is receiving a concentrated poverty adjustment under section 2502.53(c)(1)(iv) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(3) Is receiving a sparsity or size adjustment under section 2502.53(c)(1)(vii) of the Public School Code of 1949.(4) Retires or converts:(i) at least a certain percentage, as determined by the department, of the eligible applicant's internal combustion engine school buses; or(ii) the eligible applicant's internal combustion engine school buses in a certain manner.(5) Purchases electric school buses that are Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327) accessible or equipped with wheelchair lifts, with additional funding consideration for the increased costs associated with these accessibility features.(b) Accountability and compliance.--The department shall:(1) Require periodic reporting requirements for a grantee to demonstrate that a grant awarded under the program is being used in accordance with this act.(2) Develop procedures for addressing a grantee's 20250HB1539PN1810 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 noncompliance with this act, including procedures for the reimbursement of a grant awarded under the program.(c) Limitation.--The department shall limit the amount of a grant under the program as not to exceed 100% of the difference between the cost of an internal combustion engine bus and the total eligible costs for an electric school bus.(d) Charter school.--A grant received by a school district under the program shall not be included when calculating the amount to be paid to a charter school under section 1725.1-A of the Public School Code of 1949.(e) Utilization.--If a grant under the program is based on a priority category listed under subsection (a), the eligible applicant shall be required to utilize the grant to provide or upgrade services in the areas specified in the grant application.Section 5. Electric School Bus Grant Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Electric School Bus Grant Program Fund is established within the State Treasury.(b) Administration.--The department shall administer the fund for the purposes of this act.(c) Sources and deposits.--(1) The fund shall consist of:(i) Federal money.(ii) Gifts, grants and donations from public and private entities.(iii) Money transferred or appropriated to the fund by the General Assembly for implementation of the program.(2) The department shall transmit money received under paragraph (1) to the State Treasurer, who shall deposit the 20250HB1539PN1810 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money into the fund.(d) Authorization.--The department may seek, accept and receive money described in subsection (c).(e) Appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes of this act.(f) Interest and income.--The State Treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.(g) Direct or indirect costs.--The department may use up to 8% of the money in the fund to cover the direct and indirect costs that the department incurs in administering the program.(h) Technical assistance.--The department shall reserve a portion of the money in the fund to provide ongoing technical assistance to school entities, including assistance in obtaining and utilizing financial resources and understanding fleet transition considerations.Section 6. Reports.(a) Issuance.--On or before January 1, 2026, and on or before the January 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter, the department shall issue a report summarizing the progress of the program.(b) Submittal.--Each report under subsection (a) shall be submitted to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the 20250HB1539PN1810 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Energy Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Accessibility.--The department shall post a copy of each report under subsection (a) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1539PN1810 - 8 - 12345678910